Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Department of Human Services
71-1-123. Recovery by state of certain benefits incorrectly paid or for which recipient is reimbursed.

Any benefits paid to, or on behalf of, any recipient cannot be recovered from such a beneficiary unless such assistance has been incorrectly paid, or unless the recipient or beneficiary recovers or is entitled to recover from a third-party reimbursement for all or part of the costs of care or treatment for an injury or illness for which the assistance is paid.

To the extent of payments of assistance, the state shall be subrogated to all rights of recovery, for the cost of care or treatment for an injury or illness for which assistance is provided, contractual or otherwise, of the recipients against any person.

Payments to a provider of services shall not be withdrawn or reduced to recover funds obtained by the recipient from third parties for services rendered by such provider if these funds were obtained without the knowledge or direct assistance of the provider of assistance.

When the state asserts its right to subrogation, the state shall notify the recipient, in language understandable to all recipients, of such recipient's rights of recovery against third parties and that such recipient should seek the advice of an attorney regarding those rights of recovery to which such recipient may be entitled.

If, while receiving assistance, the recipient becomes possessed of any resource or income in excess of the amount stated in the application for the assistance provided, it is the duty of the recipient immediately to notify the agency designated to determine eligibility for the assistance of the receipt or possession of such resource or income.

When it is found that any person has failed to so notify the agency that such person is or was possessed of any resource or income in excess of the amount allowed, or when it is found that within three (3) years prior to the date of that person's application, or as otherwise provided by policy or state plan, a recipient made an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering the recipient eligible for assistance as provided in this part, any amount of assistance paid in excess of the amount to which the recipient was entitled shall constitute benefits incorrectly paid. Any benefits incorrectly paid shall be recoverable from the recipient, while living, as a debt due to the state and, upon the recipient's death, as a claim classified with taxes having preference under the laws of this state.

Upon accepting assistance from the programs designated in this part, the recipient shall be deemed to have made an assignment to the state of the right to third-party insurance benefits to which the recipient may be entitled.

Failure of the recipient to reimburse the state for the assistance received from any third-party insurance benefits received as a result of an illness or injury for which the assistance was paid may be grounds for removing the recipient from future participation in the benefits available under these programs as provided by policy or state plan; provided, that:

Any removal from participation shall be after appropriate advance notice to the recipient;

The provider of service shall not be prevented from receiving payment from the state for assistance services previously furnished the recipient; and

Nothing in this subsection (b) shall require an insurer to pay benefits to the state that have already been paid to the recipient.

The right of subrogation by the state to the recipient's right to recovery shall be subject to ordinary and reasonable attorney fees.

Where a recipient has retained an attorney, the attorney shall not be considered liable unless the attorney has notice from the state of the state's claim of subrogation prior to disbursement of the funds to the recipient.

This section shall apply to all programs provided by the department pursuant to the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.), as amended, and the federal Rehabilitation Act (29 U.S.C § 701 et seq.), as amended, and as provided in the Vocational Rehabilitation Law of Tennessee, compiled in title 49, chapter 11, part 6.

Acts 1990, ch. 609, § 1.

71-1-124, 71-1-125. [Reserved.]

The commissioner of finance and administration is hereby directed to begin the process of reviewing, for the purposes of reforming, the state's medicaid program. Such review shall include reviewing managed care programs and applying for needed federal waivers as well as the development of plans for consideration by the governor and the general assembly outlining options the state has under federal law concerning, but not limited to, eligibility, scope and duration of services, optional services, and rate structures. The governor is hereby authorized to appoint committees, as the governor deems appropriate, to assist in the overall review of the medicaid program, it being the legislative intent that the state of Tennessee develop a medicaid program that can continue to provide the necessary health care services to those appropriately in need at a cost that can be supported within existing sources of revenue.

Acts 1992, ch. 913, § 19; 2010, ch. 1030, § 18; 2013, ch. 236, § 62; 2016, ch. 797, §§ 6, 7.

71-1-127, 71-1-128.
[Reserved.]

Acting in consultation with the departments of education, health, mental health and substance abuse services, and intellectual and developmental disabilities, through a system of competitive grants and technical assistance, the department of human services shall establish and implement “parents as first teachers” pilot projects in one (1) or more counties of the state. On or before January 1, 1998, the department shall report to the governor and to the general assembly concerning pilot project findings and recommendations.

Acts 1995, ch. 483, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 132; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-1-130. Day care services — Rate of reimbursement — Market rate study.

The department shall perform a market rate study of day care rates annually.

In compliance with federal law and regulations and from the market rate study, the department shall annually determine an amount to be paid as reimbursement on behalf of low-income families, for the provision of child or infant care by a day care center, family day care home, or group day care home.

The commissioner shall report to the governor and the general assembly, no later than October 1 of each year, the results of the market rate study and the annual rate that has been requested by the department in its budget.

The average rate to be paid by the department for day care services in fiscal year 1990-1991 shall be forty-six dollars ($46.00) per week. An additional two dollars ($2.00) per day may be paid for transportation in “as-needed” day care, if it is furnished by the day care provider.

The amounts to be paid by the department for day care services and transportation under this section shall be subject to the availability of funding each year in the general appropriations act.

In any case where the department terminates a certificate for an eligible child for child care services with a child care provider, the department shall promptly, but in any event within forty-eight (48) hours, inform the provider that the child's certificate is or will no longer be in effect.

A parent or other caretaker of an eligible child who receives a subsidy certificate from the department shall be solely responsible for payment to the provider of child care services any required copayments or other payments required pursuant to any contractual agreement with the provider of child care services.

Unless extenuating circumstances or other good cause applies as determined by the department, upon removal of a child from a provider of child care services, no subsidy certificate shall be issued or any payments made by the department on behalf of the child to any subsequent provider of child care services, unless the parent or other caretaker of the eligible child has made all required copayments to, or has reached an agreement regarding outstanding copayments with, the previous provider of child care services.

For purposes of this subsection (g), “copayment” means the department-imposed fee required to be paid by the parent or caretaker on behalf of the eligible child to the provider of child care services as a condition for the receipt of a subsidy certificate.

Nothing in this subsection (g) shall be construed to require the department to resolve or mediate any dispute between the parent or caretaker of any eligible child and the provider of child care services relative to outstanding copayments.

Acts 1990, ch. 1072, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §71-3-129; Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 21; 2006, ch. 747, § 1.

71-1-131. Confidentiality of records.

The records of the department, its contractors or agents concerning the provision of Title IV-D child or spousal support services shall be confidential and information in such records shall not be subject to public inspection by any person or entity and the records shall not be used in judicial, administrative or legislative proceedings or for law enforcement activities, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Any information provided to the department, its contractors or agents by any other state or federal agencies or other entities, that is required by federal or state law or regulations to be provided to the department as part of the department's Title IV-D responsibilities to establish, enforce or modify child or spousal support, but which information is otherwise protected as confidential by the laws or regulations of the United States or by any state's, territory's or other government's law or regulations, shall also be confidential, and shall be held by the department in a confidential manner. Such information shall also not be subject to public inspection by any person or entity and shall not be used in judicial, administrative or legislative proceedings or for law enforcement activities, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Except as limited by subdivision (a)(2), the department, its contractors or agents may disclose any information in the records of the Title IV-D child or spousal support records for purposes directly connected with the establishment of paternity or the establishment, modification, or enforcement of child or spousal support in any judicial or administrative proceeding or for the administration of any part of the child support program.

Except where information in the child or spousal support record provided to the department pursuant to any federal or state law or regulation for purposes related to the establishment, enforcement or modification of child or spousal support under the Title IV-D child support program is otherwise specifically protected from further disclosure or further use by any other federal, state, territorial or other government law or regulation, the department is specifically authorized to further utilize or further disclose any information from the Title IV-D child or spousal support records for any purposes that it determines in its sole discretion are directly connected with:

The administration of the plan or program approved under Parts A, B, D, or E of Title IV of the Social Security Act or under Titles I, XIV, XIX, or XX of the Social Security Act, or the supplemental security income program (SSI) established under Title XVI of the Social Security Act;

Any investigations, prosecutions, or civil, criminal or administrative proceeding conducted in connection with the administration of any such plan or program under subdivision (a)(2)(A);

The administration of any other federal or federally assisted program that provides assistance, in cash or in kind, or services, directly to individuals on the basis of need;

Reporting to an appropriate agency or official, information on known or suspected instances of physical or mental injury, sexual abuse or exploitation, or negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child who is the subject of a child enforcement activity under circumstances that indicate that the child's health or welfare is threatened by such treatment;

A response to a request for child support payment records of a child support obligor; and

Inquiries from legislative representatives of an obligor or obligee concerning child support payment records or child support legal and administrative procedures utilized to attempt recovery of support payments involved in individual cases under a support order upon a release for that person authorized in any suitable manner as determined by the department or its contractors by the affected person. An inquiry and release by one party under this subdivision (a)(2)(F) does not authorize release of information involving the other party other than the child support payment record and child support legal or administrative procedures utilized to attempt recovery of support payments from the other party. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(2)(F) shall be construed to authorize release of any information that is otherwise protected as confidential pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section and any other law to the contrary, no information shall be disclosed by the department pursuant to this section from Title IV-D records maintained by the department, its contractors or agents when:

A protective order has been entered against one party and the release of information from such record would disclose the whereabouts of the party or the child for whose benefit the protective order was entered; or

The department, its contractors or agents have reason to believe that the release of information concerning the whereabouts of one party or the child to another person may result in physical or emotional harm to the party or the child.

In situations in which the prohibitions of subdivisions (a)(3)(A)(i) and (ii) arise, the department shall notify the secretary of health and human services if it determines that there exists reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse against a party or the child and that the disclosure of such information could be harmful to the party or the child.

When a disclosure of information is made from the United States department of health and human services' federal parent locator service (FPLS) to a court of this state or an agent of the court of this state, and the court is notified that FPLS has reasonable evidence to show that domestic violence or child abuse has occurred, the court shall determine whether disclosure to any other person of information received from FPLS could be harmful to the parent or child and, if the court determines that disclosure to any other person could be harmful, the court and its agents shall not make such disclosure.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, when any information regarding a consumer report, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1681a, from a consumer reporting agency is obtained by the department, its contractors or agents, such information will be kept confidential and will be used solely for the purposes of establishing an individual's capacity to make child or spousal support payments or in determining the appropriate level of such payments, and such report shall be confidential and will not be available by subpoena or court order for any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding, law enforcement activity or for any other purpose, except for the purpose of the establishment, enforcement and modification of child or spousal support obligations by the department, or by any federal, state, territorial, or foreign child or spousal support enforcement agency, or by their contractors or agents.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any financial information obtained from a financial institution by the department, its contractors or agents regarding an individual shall be confidential and will not be available by subpoena or court order for any civil, criminal or administrative proceeding, law enforcement activity or for any other purpose, and shall be disclosed only for the purpose of and to the extent necessary for the establishment, enforcement and modification of child or spousal support obligations by the department, its contractors or agents or by any federal, state, territorial, or foreign child support enforcement agency or their contractors or agents.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any information that is required to be given to the department of human services, its contractors or agents by any requirement of federal or state law or regulations as part of the department's responsibilities to enforce child or spousal support, but that is otherwise not subject to subdivisions (a)(4) and (a)(5), and that is otherwise ordinarily protected by federal or state law or regulations from disclosure or use because it is protected as confidential information, shall be confidential and shall not be available by subpoena or court order for any civil, criminal, administrative proceeding, law enforcement activity, or for any other purpose. Such information shall be disclosed only to the extent permitted by such federal or state laws or regulations, or only for the purpose of and to the extent necessary for the establishment, enforcement and modification of child support obligations by the department, its contractors or agents or by any federal, state, territorial, or foreign child support enforcement agency or their contractors or agents.

Except as released pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) by the department, its contractors or agents, and except as prohibited by subdivisions (a)(3) — (a)(6), the records or portions of records or testimony of current or former employees, agents or contractors of the department concerning the Title IV-D child support program may be released only pursuant to a written order for their disclosure issued by a judicial or administrative tribunal and served personally upon the commissioner of human services or the commissioner's designee at least five (5) business days prior to the date designated for disclosure. A subpoena shall not be sufficient to obtain the disclosure of Title IV-D child support records. Unless waived by the department, any order for disclosure not properly served shall be void and of no effect whatsoever.

Except as necessary for use in a judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding concerning a Title IV-D child or spousal support matter in which such records must be disclosed, and for any appeal from the proceeding, any records of the Title IV-D child support program that may be ordered disclosed pursuant to this subdivision (a)(7)(A) for use in any other civil or criminal judicial or other administrative proceeding must also have a written protective order issued by the court or administrative law judge or hearing officer and served upon the commissioner of human services prior to the release of the records pursuant to this subdivision (a)(7)(A). The protective order shall state that there will be no further disclosure beyond the necessary use by the tribunal and the parties for the conduct of those proceedings. The department shall not be required to disclose any records until the receipt of the protective order by the department or its designee.

The department may comply with a properly served order issued by a state or local judicial or administrative tribunal pursuant to this subdivision (a)(7) by sending copies of pertinent portions of the record requested, or by sending an abstract of the pertinent information from its computer records or other records, in a sealed envelope addressed to the court or administrative body or the person taking a deposition, together with an affidavit of an authorized agent of the department attesting to the authenticity of the record, unless the court or administrative body, for good cause shown, enters an order in the record requiring the attendance of a department, contractor or agent employee at the proceeding.

The department, its contractors or agents may file a motion to quash or modify any subpoena or order for disclosure issued by any judicial or administrative tribunal or by any legislative entity, and no records shall be disclosed pursuant to any subpoena or order until the conclusion, including appeal, of the proceedings seeking to quash or modify the subpoena or order.

A knowing violation of the provisions restricting the disclosure of information pursuant to this section shall be a Class B misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, information that is required to be provided to the department of human services, its contractors or agents by the department of labor and workforce development shall not be further disclosed or utilized except to the extent permitted and for the purposes allowable pursuant to § 50-7-701 or under applicable federal or state law or regulations.

Acts 1997, ch. 551, § 10; 1998, ch. 1098, §§ 65-67; 1999, ch. 520, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. Title I of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

Title IV-A of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.

Title IV-B of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 620 et seq.

Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.

Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.

Title XIV of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 1351 et seq.

Title XVI of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.

Title XIX of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.

Title XX of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 1397 et seq.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Title IV-D child support enforcement: welfare eligibility, custody and privilege issues, OAG 00-027, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (2/18/00).

Records of the department of human services do not lose their character as agency records simply because they have been included in the record of a trial court proceeding and, therefore, such records remain confidential, OAG 00-128, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 129 (8/10/00).

71-1-132. Rule making authority — Compliance with federal law — Notice of rulemaking.

The department shall have rulemaking authority to establish any rules necessary for the administration of the child support program operated pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.), and shall have rulemaking authority to establish any rules to carry out the requirements of any title or part of any title that the department administers and that are necessary to implement the Title IV-D child support program and to effectuate any federal legislative or regulatory changes.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department shall have authority after July 1, 1997, to promulgate any emergency rules, following approval by the attorney general and reporter pursuant to § 4-5-208, to implement chapter 551 of the Acts of 1997 or of any title or part of any title that the department administers and that may be necessary to implement chapter 551 of the Acts of 1997, which emergency rules shall become effective upon the effective date of any provisions of Acts 1997, ch. 551, if the implementation period of any provisions of chapter 551 of the Acts of 1997, occurs before July 1, 1998; provided, however, that the department shall promulgate permanent rules to implement chapter 551 of the Acts of 1997, pursuant to a rulemaking hearing as required by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Nothing in this subsection (a) shall be construed to abrogate the ability of the department at any time to utilize the provisions for implementing emergency rules as otherwise permitted by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary, the department shall have the authority to immediately implement any federal legislative or regulatory changes by emergency rules following approval by the attorney general and reporter pursuant to § 4-5-208 if such federal legislative or regulatory changes occur before July 1, 1998; provided, however, that permanent rules shall be promulgated pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be construed to abrogate the ability of the department at any time to utilize the provisions for implementing emergency rules as otherwise permitted by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any forms mandated by the secretary of health and human services that are required to be utilized by the department of human services in any aspect of the Title IV-D child support program administered by the department shall be implemented immediately by emergency rule of the department following approval by the attorney general and reporter pursuant to § 4-5-208, and shall, in all respects, immediately supersede any forms in use at the time the department implements the use of such federal forms by emergency rule. Any requirements of the laws or regulations of this state that are inconsistent with the language or procedures established by such federal forms shall be subordinate to the requirements imposed by such federal forms.

Prior to the filing of a notice of rulemaking for permanent rules pursuant to this section, the rules shall be sent by the department for review by an advisory group composed of two (2) representatives of the state court clerks' conference appointed by the president of the state court clerks' association, two (2) representatives of the judges of courts who have child support responsibilities, one of whom will be appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court and one of whom will be appointed by the president of the council of juvenile and family court judges, a representative of the administrative office of the courts, and two (2) representatives of the department of human services designated by the commissioner. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prevent the department from filing any notice of rulemaking prior to or at the time the proposed permanent rules are sent to the advisory group where the department determines that immediate filing of the notice without prior review by the advisory group is necessary to meet any requirements relative to the potential expiration of emergency rules or to comply with any federal statutory or regulatory requirements or any federal policy directives, nor shall the requirement of this subsection (d) be construed to supersede any requirements of subsection (c).

Acts 1997, ch. 551, § 68; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Acts 1997, ch. 551, referred to in this section, enacted and amended numerous sections relative to child support, primarily in title 36, chapter 5. For full treatment, see the Session Laws Disposition Table in Volume 13.

71-1-133. Child care services fraud — Restitution — Civil recovery of overpayments.

Whoever knowingly obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person or entity to obtain or attempt to obtain, by means of a willfully false statement or representation or by impersonation, or by any fraudulent scheme, any child care services, or payments for child care services, that are provided under any program by the department of human services or by or through any of the department's grantees or contractors, to which such person or entity is not entitled, or of a value greater than that to which such person or entity is entitled, the value of which is, or would be, one hundred ($100) or more, commits a Class E felony. Upon conviction, such person shall be sentenced for such offense as provided by law, or shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

If the value of child care services or the payment for such services obtained in the manner described in subdivision (a)(1) is, or would be, less than one hundred dollars ($100), such person commits a Class A misdemeanor and shall be sentenced for such offense, or shall be fined, or both, as provided by law.

In addition to any of the penalties pursuant to subsection (a), any person convicted of any offense specified in subsection (a) shall be ordered to make restitution in the total amount found to be the value of the child care services that form the basis for the conviction. In the event any person ordered to make restitution pursuant to this section is found to be indigent and, therefore, unable to make restitution in full at the time of conviction, the court shall order a periodic payment plan consistent with the person's financial ability.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, prosecutions for any of the offenses specified in subsection (a) shall be commenced within four (4) years next after the commission of the offense. For purposes of this subsection (c), any such offense that is based upon a willful failure to report information as required by law or by any program requirements relating to eligibility for child care services is considered a continuing offense until such information is reported.

The department may recover by civil action in any appropriate court the value of child care services that have been incorrectly paid to or received by any person or any entity and the costs of the proceeding and reasonable attorneys fees necessary for collection.

For purposes of this section, “child care” means the supervision, protection, and provision for the basic physical, developmental or emotional needs of a child, or evidence of any effort to provide for, or any apparent or stated intent to provide for, the supervision, protection, and basic physical, developmental or emotional needs of a child by any person or entity outside the child's own home or by a person who comes to the child's home, whether or not the person or entity is licensed to provide such care or is unregulated.

For purposes of this section “services” means the payment for, or provision by, the department, its grantees or its contractors of:

Any costs of, or any fees for, child care provided by any person or entity;

Any transportation costs or any transportation fees for the child to obtain child care or any related child care services; or

Any food supplement or meal assistance programs, excluding the food stamp or food assistance program under chapter 5, part 3 of this title, for a child who is receiving child care.

Acts 2000, ch. 923, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-1-134. License, certification or registration — Notifications — Prerequisites — Website — Electronic notifications.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each applicant for a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity where to obtain a copy of any statutes, rules, guidelines, and policies setting forth the prerequisites for the license, certification or registration and shall, upon request, make available to the applicant a copy of the statutes, rules, guidelines, and policies.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the board, commission, agency or other governmental entity of changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines, upon the issuance and upon each renewal of a holder's license, certification or registration.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall establish and maintain a link or links on the entity's website to the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the entity and that impact an applicant for, or a holder of, a professional or occupational license, certification, or registration from the entity.

The department and each board, commission, agency, or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall allow each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity to have the option of being notified by electronic mail of:

Renewals of the holder's license, certification or registration;

Any fee increases;

Any changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines; and

Any meeting where changes in rules or fees are on the agenda. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(D), the electronic notice shall be at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the meeting, unless it is an emergency meeting then the notice shall be sent as soon as is practicable.

The department and each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration of the availability of receiving electronic notices pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) upon issuance or renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration.

Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 12; 2012, ch. 952, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 13 provided that each entity subject to the act shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-1-135. Victims of human trafficking.

The commissioner of human services shall establish a plan for the delivery of services to victims of human trafficking after consultation with the following departments:

Department of children's services;

Department of health;

Department of intellectual and developmental disabilities;

Department of mental health and substance abuse services; and

Tennessee bureau of investigation.

The plan developed under subsection (a) shall include, but not be limited to, provisions to:

Identify victims of human trafficking in this state;

Identify community-based services for victims of human trafficking;

Assist victims of human trafficking through the provision of information regarding access to benefits and services to which those victims may be entitled;

Coordinate delivery of services and information concerning health care, mental health care, legal services, housing, job training, education and victim's compensation funds;

Prepare and disseminate educational materials and provide training programs to increase awareness of human trafficking and the services available to victims; and

Assist victims of human trafficking with family reunification.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b), the plan shall include a timeline for which the department anticipates the state would be capable of implementing the plan, along with anticipated rates of assistance to victims of human trafficking, cost of implementation, an itemized rationale for both, and any other factor that the department opines will significantly contribute to or detract from the success of implementing the plan.

By July 1, 2013, the department of human services shall transmit a copy of the plan and issue a report to the chair of the judiciary committee of the senate and the chair of the judiciary committee of the house of representatives.

Acts 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 963, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 33; 2019, ch. 345, § 132.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “chair of the judiciary committee of the house of representatives” for “chair of the criminal justice committee of the house of representatives” at the end of (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.